Illinois, session 104th, SB1977.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 15-172 and 21-385 and by adding Section 15-163 as 6follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/15-163 new)8    Sec. 15-163. Homestead exemption impact statement. 9    (a) On and after July 1, 2026, any bill to amend an 10existing homestead exemption or to create a new homestead 11exemption shall include the submission of an impact statement 12prepared by the sponsor of the bill, to accompany the bill, 13that identifies the following:14        (1) the policy purpose, goal, and demographics of who 15    may be impacted by proposal;16        (2) the effect of the homestead exemption on taxing 17    districts, including a description of how the homestead 18    exemption could have varying effects across communities, 19    counties, and townships; and20        (3) optional funding sources that could be considered 21    by taxing districts to replace any identified additional 22    burdens placed on taxpayers through the adoption of 23    additional exemptions.  SB1977- 2 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    (b) The impact statement must be provided before the first 2legislative vote on a bill to create new or amend homestead 3exemptions.4    (c) As used in this Section: 5    "Homestead" means the land and buildings thereon, 6including a condominium or a dwelling unit in a multi-dwelling 7building that is owned and operated as a cooperative, occupied 8by the taxpayer as the taxpayer's principal residence, or 9which is temporarily unoccupied by the taxpayer because the 10taxpayer is temporarily residing, for not more than one year, 11in a licensed facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the 12Nursing Home Care Act.13    "Homestead exemption" means a property tax exemption that 14decreases all or a portion of the equalized assessed value of 15homestead property for a designated group of taxpayers. The 16term "homestead exemption" is limited to an exemption that is 17granted for the purpose of residential property tax relief and 18that has one or more of the following goals: (i) lowering the 19tax burden on targeted and identified groups; (ii) promoting 20progressivity into property tax system; (iii) sheltering 21groups at risk by lowering tax burden; or (iv) supporting 22rehabilitation and maintenance of existing housing.  23    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)24    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 25Homestead Exemption.   SB1977- 3 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 2Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.3    (b) As used in this Section:4    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 5application under this Section.6    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 7of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 8value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 9value of the residence after the base year.10    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 11year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 12the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 13property was improved with a permanent structure that was 14occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 15paying real property taxes on the property and who was either 16(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 17equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 18instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 19lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 20residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 21applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 22equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 23equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 24that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 25value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 26property that reduces the assessed value for one or more   SB1977- 4 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 2the base year until a new base year is established under the 3terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 4County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 5for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 6exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 7officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 8lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 9that is based on an assessed value that results from a 10temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 11assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 12considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 13year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 14thereafter until a new base year is established under the 15terms of this paragraph.16    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 17Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 18the property is located.19    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 20Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 21Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 22services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 23average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 24    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 25equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.26    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the   SB1977- 5 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 2applicant as their principal place of residence.3    "Household income" means the combined income of the 4members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 5taxable year.6    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 7of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 8Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 92001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.10    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 11Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 12relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 13preceding the taxable year.14    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 15a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 16Act.17    "Maximum income limitation" means:18        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;19        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;20        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;21        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;22        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 23        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 24    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 25    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 26    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants;   SB1977- 6 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    and 2        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2024 and 3    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; . 4        (8) for taxable year 2025, $85,000 for all qualified 5    property; and6        (9) for taxable years 2026 and thereafter, the maximum 7    income limitation for the immediately preceding taxable 8    year, multiplied by one plus the lesser of (i) the 9    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 10    for All Urban Consumers for the 12 months ending in March 11    of the immediately preceding calendar year or (ii) 3%; the 12    maximum income limitation under this item (9) shall be 13    rounded to the nearest dollar.14    By June 1, 2026, and by June 1 of each year thereafter, the 15Department of Revenue shall determine the maximum income 16limitation for the applicable taxable year and shall post that 17amount on its website. 18    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 19enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 20have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 21limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 22to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 23Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 24which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 25the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 26is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB1977- 7 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 2by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 3Estate Tax Deferral Program. 4    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 5she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 6exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 7any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 8submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 9unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 10Information Act. 11    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 12appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 13State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 14and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 15upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 16residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 17has established a specific legal description for a portion of 18property constituting the residence, then that portion of 19property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 20this Section.21    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 22valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 23levied.24    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 25citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 26real property that is improved with a permanent structure that   SB1977- 8 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 2of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 3income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 4(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 5property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 6a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 7written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 8to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 9permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 10occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 11or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 12that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 13a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 14lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 15taxes on that property. 16    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 17of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 18assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 19application is made minus the base amount. In all other 20counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 21through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 22thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 23equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 24for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 25for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 26follows:  SB1977- 9 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 2    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 3    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 4    year for which application is made minus the base amount.5        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 6    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 7    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 8    residence in the taxable year for which application is 9    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.10        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 11    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 12    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 13    residence in the taxable year for which application is 14    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.15        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 16    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 17    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 18    residence in the taxable year for which application is 19    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.20        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 21    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 22    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 23    residence in the taxable year for which application is 24    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 25    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 26for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption   SB1977- 10 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 2amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 3the prior year.4    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 5to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 6shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 7improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 8were added after the base year for this parcel and that 9increased the assessed value of the property.10    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 11owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 12life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 13maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 14property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 15for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 16(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 17does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 18liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 19paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 20owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 21cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 22interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 23exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 24association or its management firm shall credit the savings 25resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 26liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any   SB1977- 11 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 2owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 3misdemeanor.4    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 5Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 6licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 7Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 8Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 9the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 10years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 11the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 12unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 13homestead exemption.14    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 15would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 16the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 17exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 18shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 19preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 20except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 21qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 22years.23    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 24exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 25one of such persons and for only one residence.26    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than   SB1977- 12 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b13,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 2shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 3County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 4is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 5for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 6receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 7the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 8property is located during such period as may be specified by 9the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 10Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 12period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 133,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 14thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 15application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 16Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 17located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 18submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 19applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 20the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 21(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 22spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 23the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 24shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 25of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 26Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any   SB1977- 13 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 2that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 3application shall contain or be verified by a written 4declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 5taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 6perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 72012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 8for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 9Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 10receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 11County Assessment Officer.12    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 13counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 14applicant fails to file the application required by this 15Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 16mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 17render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 18timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 19the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 20regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 21may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 22original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 23provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 24Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 25the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 26or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the   SB1977- 14 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 2registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 3condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 4incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 5the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 6file the application.7    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 8provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 93,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 10application required by this Section in a timely manner and 11this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 12sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 13filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 14Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 15of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 16paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 17Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 18applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 19physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 20condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 21registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 22condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 23incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.24    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 25applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 26denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment   SB1977- 15 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 2taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 3determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 4than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 5exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 6of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 7as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 8(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 9taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 10as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 11erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.12    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 13of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 14apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 15Application shall be made during the application period in 16effect for the county of his or her residence. 17    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 18eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 19cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 20by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 21questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 22that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 23by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 24each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 25may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 26credited that exemption.  SB1977- 16 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    Except as provided in this Section, all information 2received by the chief county assessment officer or the 3Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 4any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 5Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 6or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 7or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 8sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 9imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 10information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 11judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.12    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 13Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 14making available reasonable statistics concerning the 15operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 16the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 17way that information contained in any individual claim shall 18not be disclosed.19    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 20year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 21inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 22of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 23this Section or (ii) $2,000. 24    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 25chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 26the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property   SB1977- 17 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 2year, provided that: 3        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 4    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 5    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 6        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 7    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 8    as of January 1, 2019; 9        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 10    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 11    this Code; and 12        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 13    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 14    taxable years. 15    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 16authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 17audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 18Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 19exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 20    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 21chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 22the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 23that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 24year, if:25        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 26    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act   SB1977- 18 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;2        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 3    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 4    as of January 1, 2020;5        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 6    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 7    this Code; and8        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 9    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 10    taxable years.11    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 12authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 13audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 14Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 15exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 16    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 17publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 18under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 19days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 20application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 21Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 22notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 23the county.24    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 25Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 26implementation of any mandate created by this Section.   SB1977- 19 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 2102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 3    (35 ILCS 200/21-385)4    Sec. 21-385. Extension of period of redemption. 5    (a) For any tax certificates held by a county pursuant to 6Section 21-90, the redemption period for each tax certificate 7shall be extended by operation of law until the date 8established by the county as the redemption deadline in a 9petition for tax deed filed under Section 22-30. The 10redemption deadline established in the petition shall be 11identified in the notices provided under Sections 22-10 12through 22-25 of this Code. After a redemption deadline is 13established in the petition for tax deed, the county may 14further extend the redemption deadline by filing with the 15county clerk of the county in which the property is located a 16written notice to that effect describing the property, 17identifying the certificate number, and specifying the 18extended period of redemption. Notwithstanding any expiration 19of a prior redemption period, all tax certificates forfeited 20to the county and held pursuant to Section 21-90 shall remain 21enforceable by the county or its assignee, and redemption 22shall be extended by operation of law until the date 23established by the county as the redemption deadline in a 24petition for tax deed filed under Section 22-30. 25    (b) Within 60 days of the date of assignment, assignees of   SB1977- 20 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1forfeited certificates under Section 21-90 or Section 21-145 2of this Code must file with the county clerk of the county in 3which the property is located a written notice describing the 4property, stating the date of the assignment, identifying the 5certificate number and specifying a deadline for redemption 6that is not later than 3 years from the date of assignment. 7Upon receiving the notice, the county clerk shall stamp the 8date of receipt upon the notice. If the notice is submitted as 9an electronic record, the county clerk shall acknowledge 10receipt of the record and shall provide confirmation in the 11same manner to the certificate holder. The confirmation from 12the county clerk shall include the date of receipt and shall 13serve as proof that the notice was filed with the county clerk. 14In no event shall a county clerk permit an assignee of 15forfeited certificates under Section 21-90 or Section 21-145 16of this Code to extend the period of redemption beyond 3 years 17from the date of assignment. If the redemption period expires 18and no petition for tax deed has been filed under Section 1922-30, the assigned tax certificate shall be forfeited to and 20held by the county pursuant to Section 21-90. 21    (c) Except for the county as trustee pursuant to Section 2221-90, the purchaser or his or her assignee of property sold 23for nonpayment of general taxes or special assessments may 24extend the period of redemption at any time before the 25expiration of the original period of redemption, or thereafter 26prior to the expiration of any extended period of redemption,   SB1977- 21 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1but only for a period that will expire not later than 3 years 2from the date of sale, by filing with the county clerk of the 3county in which the property is located a written notice to 4that effect describing the property, stating the date of the 5sale and specifying the extended period of redemption. Upon 6receiving the notice, the county clerk shall stamp the date of 7receipt upon the notice. If the notice is submitted as an 8electronic record, the county clerk shall acknowledge receipt 9of the record and shall provide confirmation in the same 10manner to the certificate holder. The confirmation from the 11county clerk shall include the date of receipt and shall serve 12as proof that the notice was filed with the county clerk. The 13county clerk shall not be required to extend the period of 14redemption unless the purchaser or his or her assignee obtains 15this acknowledgement of delivery. If prior to the expiration 16of the period of redemption or extended period of redemption a 17petition for tax deed has been filed under Section 22-30, upon 18application of the petitioner, the court shall allow the 19purchaser or his or her assignee to extend the period of 20redemption after expiration of the original period or any 21extended period of redemption, provided that any extension 22allowed will expire not later than 3 years from the date of 23sale. If the period of redemption is extended, the purchaser 24or his or her assignee must give the notices provided for in 25Section 22-10 at the specified times prior to the expiration 26of the extended period of redemption by causing a sheriff (or   SB1977- 22 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1if he or she is disqualified, a coroner) of the county in which 2the property, or any part thereof, is located to serve the 3notices as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20. The notices 4may also be served as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20 by a 5special process server appointed by the court under Section 622-15 and as provided in Sections 22-15 and 22-20.7    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 8the 103rd General Assembly apply to matters concerning tax 9certificates issued on or after January 1, 2024. 10    (d) For any tax certificates held by a county, the county 11clerk may create and administer a payment plan during the 12redemption period. Under the payment plan, the county clerk 13may waive interest penalties when payments are made in 14accordance with the parameters set forth in the payment plan. 15(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 10. The Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral 17Act is amended by changing Sections 2 and 3 as follows: 18    (320 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 452)19    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:20    (a) "Qualified Taxpayer" means an individual (i) who will 21be 65 years of age or older by June 1 of the year for which a 22tax deferral is claimed; (ii) who certifies that they have 23owned and occupied as their residence such property or other 24qualifying property in the State for at least the last 3 years,   SB1977- 23 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1except for any periods during which the taxpayer may have 2temporarily resided in a nursing or sheltered care home; and 3(iii) whose household income for the year is no greater than 4the maximum household income. : (i) $40,000 through tax year 52005; (ii) $50,000 for tax years 2006 through 2011; (iii) 6$55,000 for tax years 2012 through 2021; (iv) $65,000 for tax 7years 2022 through 2025; and (v) $55,000 for tax year 2026 and 8thereafter.9    (b) "Tax deferred property" means the property upon which 10real estate taxes are deferred under this Act.11    (c) "Homestead" means the land and buildings thereon, 12including a condominium or a dwelling unit in a multidwelling 13building that is owned and operated as a cooperative, occupied 14by the taxpayer as his residence or which are temporarily 15unoccupied by the taxpayer because such taxpayer is 16temporarily residing, for not more than 1 year, in a licensed 17facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the Nursing Home Care 18Act.19    (d) "Real estate taxes" or "taxes" means the taxes on real 20property for which the taxpayer would be liable under the 21Property Tax Code, including special service area taxes, and 22special assessments on benefited real property for which the 23taxpayer would be liable to a unit of local government.24    (e) "Department" means the Department of Revenue.25    (f) "Qualifying property" means a homestead which (a) the 26taxpayer or the taxpayer and his spouse own in fee simple or   SB1977- 24 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1are purchasing in fee simple under a recorded instrument of 2sale, (b) is not income-producing property, (c) is not subject 3to a lien for unpaid real estate taxes when a claim under this 4Act is filed, and (d) is not held in trust, other than an 5Illinois land trust with the taxpayer identified as the sole 6beneficiary, if the taxpayer is filing for the program for the 7first time effective as of the January 1, 2011 assessment year 8or tax year 2012 and thereafter.9    (g) "Equity interest" means the current assessed valuation 10of the qualified property times the fraction necessary to 11convert that figure to full market value minus any outstanding 12debts or liens on that property. In the case of qualifying 13property not having a separate assessed valuation, the 14appraised value as determined by a qualified real estate 15appraiser shall be used instead of the current assessed 16valuation.17    (h) "Household income" has the meaning ascribed to that 18term in the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities 19Property Tax Relief Act.20    (i) "Collector" means the county collector or, if the 21taxes to be deferred are special assessments, an official 22designated by a unit of local government to collect special 23assessments.24    (j) "Maximum household income" means: 25        (1) $40,000 through tax year 2005; 26        (2) $50,000 for tax years 2006 through 2011;   SB1977- 25 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1        (3) $55,000 for tax years 2012 through 2021; 2        (4) $65,000 for tax years 2022 through 2024; 3        (5) $95,000 for tax year 2025; and 4        (6) for tax year 2026 and thereafter, the maximum 5    household income for the immediately preceding taxable 6    year, multiplied by one plus the lesser of (i) the 7    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 8    for All Urban Consumers for the 12 months ending in March 9    of the immediately preceding calendar year or (ii) 3%; the 10    maximum income limitation under this item (6) shall be 11    rounded to the nearest dollar. 12    By June 1, 2026, and by June 1 of each year thereafter, the 13Department of Revenue shall determine the maximum household 14income for the applicable taxable year and shall post that 15amount on its website. 16    (k) "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by 17the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department 18of Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods 19and services purchased by all urban consumers, United States 20city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 21(Source: P.A. 102-644, eff. 8-27-21.) 22    (320 ILCS 30/3)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 453)23    Sec. 3. A taxpayer may, on or before March 1 of each year, 24apply to the county collector of the county where his 25qualifying property is located, or to the official designated   SB1977- 26 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1by a unit of local government to collect special assessments 2on the qualifying property, as the case may be, for a deferral 3of all or a part of real estate taxes payable during that year 4for the preceding year in the case of real estate taxes other 5than special assessments, or for a deferral of any 6installments payable during that year in the case of special 7assessments, on all or part of his qualifying property. The 8application shall be on a form prescribed by the Department 9and furnished by the collector, (a) showing that the applicant 10will be 65 years of age or older by June 1 of the year for 11which a tax deferral is claimed, (b) describing the property 12and verifying that the property is qualifying property as 13defined in Section 2, (c) certifying that the taxpayer has 14owned and occupied as his residence such property or other 15qualifying property in the State for at least the last 3 years 16except for any periods during which the taxpayer may have 17temporarily resided in a nursing or sheltered care home, and 18(d) specifying whether the deferral is for all or a part of the 19taxes, and, if for a part, the amount of deferral applied for. 20As to qualifying property not having a separate assessed 21valuation, the taxpayer shall also file with the county 22collector a written appraisal of the property prepared by a 23qualified real estate appraiser together with a certificate 24signed by the appraiser stating that he has personally 25examined the property and setting forth the value of the land 26and the value of the buildings thereon occupied by the   SB1977- 27 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1taxpayer as his residence. The county collector may use 2eligibility for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment 3Freeze Homestead Exemption under Section 15-172 of the 4Property Tax Code as qualification for items (a) and (c). 5    The collector shall grant the tax deferral provided such 6deferral does not exceed funds available in the Senior 7Citizens Real Estate Deferred Tax Revolving Fund and provided 8that the owner or owners of such real property have entered 9into a tax deferral and recovery agreement with the collector 10on behalf of the county or other unit of local government, 11which agreement expressly states:12    (1) That the total amount of taxes deferred under this 13Act, plus interest, for the year for which a tax deferral is 14claimed as well as for those previous years for which taxes are 15not delinquent and for which such deferral has been claimed 16may not exceed 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 17property for which taxes are to be deferred and that, if the 18total deferred taxes plus interest equals 80% of the 19taxpayer's equity interest in the property, the taxpayer shall 20thereafter pay the annual interest due on such deferred taxes 21plus interest so that total deferred taxes plus interest will 22not exceed such 80% of the taxpayer's equity interest in the 23property. Effective as of the January 1, 2011 assessment year 24or tax year 2012 and through the 2021 tax year, and beginning 25again with the 2026 tax year, the total amount of any such 26deferral shall not exceed $5,000 per taxpayer in each tax   SB1977- 28 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1year. For the 2022 tax year and every tax year after through 2the 2025 tax year, the total amount of any such deferral shall 3not exceed $7,500 per taxpayer in each tax year. 4    (2) That any real estate taxes deferred under this Act and 5any interest accrued thereon are a lien on the real estate and 6improvements thereon until paid. If the taxes deferred are for 7a tax year prior to 2023, then interest shall accrue at the 8rate of 6% per year. If the taxes deferred are for the 2023 tax 9year or any tax year thereafter, then interest shall accrue at 10the rate of 3% per year. No sale or transfer of such real 11property may be legally closed and recorded until the taxes 12which would otherwise have been due on the property, plus 13accrued interest, have been paid unless the collector 14certifies in writing that an arrangement for prompt payment of 15the amount due has been made with his office. The same shall 16apply if the property is to be made the subject of a contract 17of sale. 18    (3) That upon the death of the taxpayer claiming the 19deferral the heirs-at-law, assignees or legatees shall have 20first priority to the real property upon which taxes have been 21deferred by paying in full the total taxes which would 22otherwise have been due, plus interest. However, if such 23heir-at-law, assignee, or legatee is a surviving spouse, the 24tax deferred status of the property shall be continued during 25the life of that surviving spouse if the spouse is 55 years of 26age or older within 6 months of the date of death of the   SB1977- 29 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1taxpayer and enters into a tax deferral and recovery agreement 2before the time when deferred taxes become due under this 3Section. Any additional taxes deferred, plus interest, on the 4real property under a tax deferral and recovery agreement 5signed by a surviving spouse shall be added to the taxes and 6interest which would otherwise have been due, and the payment 7of which has been postponed during the life of such surviving 8spouse, in determining the 80% equity requirement provided by 9this Section.10    (4) That if the taxes due, plus interest, are not paid by 11the heir-at-law, assignee or legatee or if payment is not 12postponed during the life of a surviving spouse, the deferred 13taxes and interest shall be recovered from the estate of the 14taxpayer within one year of the date of his death. In addition, 15deferred real estate taxes and any interest accrued thereon 16are due within 90 days after any tax deferred property ceases 17to be qualifying property as defined in Section 2.18    If payment is not made when required by this Section, 19foreclosure proceedings may be instituted under the Property 20Tax Code.21    (5) That any joint owner has given written prior approval 22for such agreement, which written approval shall be made a 23part of such agreement.24    (6) That a guardian for a person under legal disability 25appointed for a taxpayer who otherwise qualifies under this 26Act may act for the taxpayer in complying with this Act.  SB1977- 30 -LRB104 10823 HLH 20904 b1    (7) That a taxpayer or his agent has provided to the 2satisfaction of the collector, sufficient evidence that the 3qualifying property on which the taxes are to be deferred is 4insured against fire or casualty loss for at least the total 5amount of taxes which have been deferred.6    If the taxes to be deferred are special assessments, the 7unit of local government making the assessments shall forward 8a copy of the agreement entered into pursuant to this Section 9and the bills for such assessments to the county collector of 10the county in which the qualifying property is located.11(Source: P.A. 102-644, eff. 8-27-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.